Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.800

Work group—Licensure.

The department of licensing shall convene a work group of stakeholders to consider the feasibility of establishing licensure for elder and vulnerable adult referral agencies described in chapter 357, Laws of 2011. The work group will provide recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2011.

[ 2011 c 357 s 17.]